Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-205
Registration requirements; applicability; agents; services or activities; disclosure; requirements.

(1) Section 4-204 shall not apply to the following agents of foreign principals:

(a) A duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a foreign government who is so recognized by the United States Department of State, while such officer is engaged exclusively in activities that are recognized by the United States Department of State as being within the scope of the functions of such officer;

(b) Any official of a foreign government, if such government is recognized by the United States, who is not a public relations counsel, publicity agent, information service employee, or a citizen of the United States, whose name and status and the character of whose duties as such official are of public record in the United States Department of State, while such official is engaged exclusively in activities that are recognized by the United States Department of State as being within the scope of the functions of such official;

(c) Any member of the staff of, or any person employed by, a duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a foreign government who is so recognized by the United States Department of State, other than a public relations counsel, publicity agent, or information service employee, whose name and status and the character of whose duties as such member or employee are of public record in the United States Department of State, while such member or employee is engaged exclusively in the performance of activities that are recognized by the United States Department of State as being within the scope of the functions of such member or employee;

(d) Any person qualified to practice law in the State of Nebraska, insofar as such person engages or agrees to engage in the legal representation of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization before any state or federal court or agency or any agency of a political subdivision of this state, except that for the purposes of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, legal representation does not include attempts to influence or persuade agency personnel or officials other than in the course of judicial proceedings, criminal or civil law enforcement inquiries, investigations, or proceedings, or agency proceedings required by statute or regulation to be conducted on the record; or

(e) Any person who advocates on behalf of an individual for individualized immigration relief.

(2) No person acting as an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization shall subcontract for services for activities regulated under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act requiring registration as an agent of a foreign principal, or otherwise induce another person to carry out activities that are so regulated under the act unless such person fully informs all parties of their status as such an agent. The requirements of this subsection apply to any person carrying out services or activities regulated under the act requiring registration as an agent of a foreign principal.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 5.